North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-21.1 Nurseries and Nursery Stock [Repealed]

4-21.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 1; 1987, ch. 88, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-02.
Administration — Rulemaking authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 2; 1987, ch. 88, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-03.
Authority for inspection. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 3; 1987, ch. 88, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-04.
Authority for abatement — Removal from sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 4; 1987, ch. 88, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-05.
Certification of nursery stock. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 5; 1987, ch. 88, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-06.
Nursery license — Fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 6; 1987, ch. 88, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-07.
Dealer’s license — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.

4-21.1-08.
Agent’s license — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.

4-21.1-09.
Suspension and revocation of licenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.

4-21.1-10.
Special inspections — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.

4-21.1-11.
Labeling and standards for nursery stock. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 11; 1987, ch. 88, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-12.
Misrepresentation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 12; 1987, ch. 88, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-13.
Reciprocal agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 13; 1975, ch. 57, § 1; 1987, ch. 88, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-14.
Exemptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 14; 1975, ch. 57, § 2; 1987, ch. 88, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-15.
Late filing of license applications — Payment of fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.

4-21.1-16.
Penalties — Criminal — Civil — License revocation or nonrenewal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 93, § 16; 1975, ch. 106, § 19; 1987, ch. 88, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.1-17.
Deposit of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 88, § 12.